Utah statutes.
57-6-5.   Settlers under state or federal law or contract deemed occupying
claimants.
When any person has settled upon any real estate and occupied the same for
three years under or by virtue of any law or contract with the proper officers
of the state for the purchase thereof, or under any law of, or by virtue of
any purchase from, the United States, and shall have made valuable
improvements thereon, and shall be found not to be the owner thereof, or not
to have acquired a right to purchase the same from the state or the United
States, such person shall be an occupying claimant within the meaning of this
chapter.
